Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 29

Agriculture Commodities Promotion

43-29-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Agriculture Commodities Promotion Act.”

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross-References. Agricultural seeds, title 43, ch. 10.

Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Farm bureau, title 43, ch. 22.

Marketing of pecans, title 43, ch. 17.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7.

Sale of cotton, title 43, ch. 18.

Soybean promotion, title 43, ch. 20.

Tobacco sales, title 43, ch. 19.

Comparative Legislation. Agricultural commodities promotion:

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-8-1 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-550 et seq.

Collateral References. 3 Am. Jur. 2d, Agriculture, § 39.

Agriculture
3.

43-29-102. Legislative declaration — Separate and independent boards and programs.

It is declared by the general assembly to be in the interest of the public welfare that Tennessee farmers who are producers of agricultural commodities shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all purchasers, handlers, dealers, and processors of agricultural commodities in promoting, by advertising, research and other methods, the increased production, use and sale, both domestic and foreign, of any and all agricultural commodities.

It is further declared by the general assembly that this chapter is permissive by allowing producers of each separate agricultural commodity to form separate and independent commodity promotion boards under this chapter, and that each such board shall operate its own separate and independent assessment program.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 2.

43-29-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Case of eggs” means a standard thirty (30) dozen egg case;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Commodity” means beef, corn, pork, and eggs, produced on a commercial basis;

“Corn” means all kinds of varieties of corn except popcorn, sweet corn, and ornamental corns;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Egg” means a pullet egg or a hen egg and excludes all other types of eggs;

“Egg handler” or “egg dealer” means any person engaged as a wholesale distributor in the business of distributing or marketing eggs in Tennessee, regardless of where the eggs are produced;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative or other business;

“Processor” means any person engaged in the business of processing commodity products;

“Producer” means any person who produces a commodity and thereafter causes the commodity to be marketed;

“Purchaser” means any dealer or processor who purchases or receives such commodity from producers on a commercial basis;

“Qualified producer organization” means any agricultural organization, federation, or association that is organized as a “not for profit” organization under the laws of the state of Tennessee, and whose membership is fairly representative of farmers who are active producers of one (1) or more agricultural commodities covered under this chapter;

“Referendum” means any voting procedure under which affected producers may, by secret ballot, vote for or against an assessment authorized by this chapter; and

“Vote” means to cast a ballot on a referendum.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 3; 2018, ch. 870, §§ 1, 6.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment inserted “corn,” in the definition of “commodity”; and added the definition of “corn”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 870, § 7. May 3, 2018.

43-29-104. Legality of associations or activities — Restraint of trade.

No association, meeting or activity undertaken pursuant to this chapter intended to benefit all the producers, handlers and processors of commodity products shall be illegal or in restraint of trade.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 4.

43-29-105. Referendum on assessment for promotion and research.

It is further declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of beef, corn, pork, and eggs on a commercial basis shall be permitted, by referendum, to be among such respective producers and subject to this chapter, levy upon themselves an assessment on these products and provide for the collection of the assessment, for the purpose of financing or contributing towards the financing of a program of promotion, advertising and research designed to increase the consumption, use and sale of agricultural commodities in domestic as well as foreign markets.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 5; 2018, ch. 870, § 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment inserted “corn,” near the beginning of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 870, § 7. May 3, 2018.

43-29-106. Application for referendum.

Any qualified producer organization of beef, pork, and eggs may make application to the commissioner requesting a referendum of beef, pork, or egg producers, on forms prescribed by the commissioner, for the purpose of determining whether an assessment of a specified amount can be levied, collected, and disbursed under this chapter, or whether a prior assessment should be amended or terminated. The application shall state the amount of the assessment that is to be proposed in the referendum and a brief statement of the purposes for which the funds collected are proposed to be spent.

Any qualified producer organization of corn may make application to the commissioner requesting a referendum of corn producers, on forms prescribed by the commissioner, for the purpose of determining whether an assessment of one cent ($0.01) per bushel of corn sold can be levied, collected, and disbursed under this chapter, or whether a prior assessment should be terminated. The application shall briefly state the purposes for which the funds collected are proposed to be spent.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 6; 2018, ch. 870, § 3.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b), and in present (a), inserted “of beef, pork, and eggs” and “beef, pork, or egg” in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 870, § 7. May 3, 2018.

43-29-107. Review of application — Date of referendum and assessment — Notice of referendum and assessment.

Within thirty (30) days of receipt of an application requesting a referendum, the commissioner shall make a determination of whether or not the petitioner is a qualified producer organization and, upon the determination, shall set a date for the referendum, which shall not be more than sixty (60) days after receipt of the application, and shall publish by any reasonable means, the date of the referendum, the polling places and the hours they will be open, the amount of the proposed assessment, and the date the assessment shall begin, if adopted.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 7.

43-29-108. Conducting referendum — Eligibility — Voting.

Any referendum held under this chapter shall be conducted statewide, under the control and direction of the commissioner. The polling place in each county shall be the offices of the University of Tennessee agriculture extension service. All ballots shall be provided at the polling place. All voting shall be by secret ballot.

Each person seeking to vote in the referendum shall be required to file an affidavit stating that such person is a producer. Upon signing an affidavit, such person shall be eligible to vote.

The question to be decided at the first referendum for an assessment on beef, pork, or eggs shall be in the following form:

Shall the producers of assess themselves at the rate of cents per of sold, and use the funds so collected by the department of agriculture, or the department's contractor or designee, and paid over to the Tennessee promotion board to finance a program of research, education, market development, marketing, advertising, and other methods designed to promote the increased production, consumption, use, and sale of products?

The question to be decided at the first referendum for an assessment on corn shall be in the following form:

Shall the producers of corn assess themselves at the rate of one cent ($0.01) per bushel of corn sold, and use the funds so collected by the department of agriculture, or the department's contractor or designee, and paid over to the Tennessee corn promotion board to finance a program of research, education, market development, marketing, advertising, and other methods designed to promote the increased production, consumption, use, and sale of corn products?

The affirmative vote of the majority of the number of votes cast shall adopt the proposed assessment.

Within ten (10) days after the referendum, the commissioner shall canvass the votes and publicly announce the result of the referendum.

The expenses of a referendum held under this chapter shall be paid by the department until an assessment is levied. Expenses of subsequent referenda shall be paid from the promotion funds collected under this chapter.

No referendum pursuant to this chapter shall be held within one (1) year of any preceding referendum for that particular commodity except as provided in § 43-29-112.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 8; 2018, ch. 870, § 4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “(b) Each person seeking to vote in the referendum shall be required to file an affidavit stating that such person is a producer as defined in § 43-29-103. Upon signing an affidavit, such person shall be eligible to vote. The question to be decided at the first referendum shall be in the following form:“Shall the producers of assess themselves at the rate of cents per of sold, and use the funds so collected by the department of agriculture, or the department's contractor or designee, and paid over to the Tennessee promotion board to finance a program of research, education, market development, marketing, advertising, and other methods designed to promote the increased production, consumption, use, and sale of products?“The affirmative vote of the majority of the number of votes cast shall adopt the proposed assessment.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 870, § 7. May 3, 2018.

43-29-109. Withholding and transfer of funds — Report.

The assessed rate as approved by referendum shall be deducted by the purchaser from the amount paid to the producer at the first point of sale. Each purchaser shall submit to the department or to the department's contractor or designee the total amount of funds withheld from producers on or before a date specified by the commissioner. The assessment levied on each head of cattle sold shall not apply to cattle purchased by a purchaser whose only share in the proceeds of a sale is a sales commission or handling fee or other service fee and who has delivered the cattle to facilitate the transfer of ownership from the seller and a third party. These cattle must be resold within ten (10) days from the date on which the person acquired ownership, with certification made to the department on forms approved by the commissioner. On or before the twentieth day of January, April, July and October of each year, the commissioner shall pay to the promotion board for that particular commodity all proceeds collected, less refunds and less an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the gross amount collected, or a sum sufficient to cover all of the department's expenses of collection, whichever is less, together with a report of all funds collected and disbursed.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 9; 2012, ch. 1049, § 1.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment rewrote the second sentence which read: “Within ten (10) days after the end of each calendar month, each purchaser shall submit to the department the total amount of funds withheld from producers.”; and added the third and fourth sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 1049, § 4. May 21, 2012.

43-29-110. Records.

Each purchaser shall keep a complete and accurate record of commodities handled by that purchaser and shall furnish each producer with a signed sales slip showing the amount of commodities purchased from that producer and the amount deducted by the purchaser for the promotion fund. These records shall be kept for two (2) years and shall be open to inspection at any time and without notice by the commissioner or the commissioner's representative. The commissioner may from time to time require a purchaser to submit records and reports necessary for collection of the assessment.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 10.

43-29-111. Application for refund of assessments.

Within ninety (90) days of an assessment being withheld by the purchaser, any producer may make application to the commissioner, on forms to be prescribed by the commissioner, for refund of assessments withheld. The application shall be accompanied by copies of sales slips evidencing the withheld assessment for which the refund is sought.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 11.

43-29-112. Referendum on continuation of assessment program.

If the commissioner determines that, during any continuous twelve-month period the assessment program is in effect, over thirty percent (30%) of the proceeds generated by the assessment is being refunded, then the commissioner shall conduct a referendum within one hundred twenty (120) days to determine whether the assessment program should remain in effect.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 12.

43-29-113. Establishment of promotion boards.

If a referendum is carried in the affirmative and an assessment is to be levied as provided in this chapter, a promotion board shall be established according to the provisions set out in this chapter for each particular commodity.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 13.

43-29-114. Promotion boards — Meetings — Organization — Duties.

Members of each board shall meet and organize within thirty (30) days of their appointment and shall elect a chair, a vice chair and a secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, each to serve for a one-year term. The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be prescribed by the commissioner to the extent applicable and shall include the following:

Developing and recommending to the commissioner administrative rules and procedures relating to the assessments;

Preparing and effectuating the estimated budget required for the proper operation of the board;

Developing methods for assessing producers and methods for collecting the necessary funds;

Collecting and assembling information necessary for the proper administration of the assessment program; and

Performing any other duties necessary to the operation of the promotion program in coordination with the commissioner.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 14.

43-29-115. Use of funds by promotion boards — Reports.

A commodity promotion board shall spend the proceeds of an assessment solely to finance a program of research, education, market development, marketing and advertising designed to promote the increased consumption, production, use and sale of agricultural commodities.

A commodity promotion board shall not spend its funds in any manner for political purposes or to influence any legislative action or rulemaking process, either state or federal, or to fund the organizational or membership activities of any group, association or organization.

The board may accept gifts and grants and shall invest any idle funds.

The members of a commodity promotion board shall not be compensated, but shall be reimbursed travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

An annual report of its activities shall be filed with the commissioner on or before the date specified by the commissioner.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 15; 2012, ch. 1049, § 2.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment rewrote (e) which read: “An annual report of its activities shall be filed each January with the commissioner.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 1049, § 4. May 21, 2012.

43-29-116. Personal debt — Penalties — Collection.

Any amount withheld, or that should have been withheld, by the purchaser due to an assessment shall be a personal debt of the purchaser. If the purchaser's monthly payments to the commissioner are not timely made, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount due shall be imposed. The commissioner may bring a civil action against the purchaser for collection of the debt and the above specified ten percent (10%) penalty.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 16.

43-29-117. Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to provide for the implementation of this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 17.

43-29-118. Beef promotion board.

The Tennessee beef promotion board shall be composed of twelve (12) members, to be appointed by the commissioner as provided in this section.

All twelve (12) members of the board shall be producers of beef animals or representatives of the beef industry in the state. The members of the Tennessee beef promotion board shall be the members of the board of directors of the Tennessee beef industry council, certified under 7 CFR 1260.315. Vacancies that occur shall be filled by the commissioner from individuals nominated by the organizations that are represented on the board of directors of the Tennessee beef industry council and in the same representation ratios.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the board.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 18; 2012, ch. 1049, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The beef promotion board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment rewrote this section which read: “(a) The Tennessee beef promotion board shall be composed of nine (9) members, to be appointed by the commissioner to serve for terms of three (3) years, as hereinafter provided. All nine (9) members of the board shall be producers of beef animals in the state of Tennessee.“(b) Within ten (10) days of the effective date of assessment levied pursuant to this chapter, the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, the Tennessee Livestock Association or its successor organization, the Tennessee Livestock Auction Market Association and any officially recognized purebred beef cattle producer association shall submit the names of beef producers to the commissioner, who shall appoint three (3) members from the nominations submitted by the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, three (3) members from the nominations submitted by the Tennessee Livestock Association or its successor organization, one (1) member from the nominations submitted by the Tennessee Livestock Auction Market Association, and two (2) members from the nominations submitted by the officially recognized purebred beef cattle producer associations.“(c) The original board shall be appointed with members appointed in the discretion of the commissioner, three (3) members for one (1) year, three (3) members for two (2) years and three (3) members for three (3) years. Each year thereafter, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of board members' terms, each organization shall submit the names of nominees to the commissioner and succeeding boards shall be appointed by the commissioner in the same manner, giving proportional representation to each organization as provided in this section.“(d) Vacancies that occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made.“(e) No board member shall serve more than a total of two (2) consecutive three-year terms unless that member does not serve as a board member for at least one (1) full year after serving two (2) consecutive three-year terms.“(f) The commissioner shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the board.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 1049, § 4. July 1, 2012.

43-29-119. Pork promotion board.

The Tennessee pork promotion board shall be composed of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the commissioner to serve terms of three (3) years, as hereinafter provided. All seven (7) members of the board shall be producers of pork animals in the state of Tennessee.

Within ten (10) days of the effective date of an assessment levied pursuant to this chapter, the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, the Tennessee Livestock Association or its successor organization and any officially recognized purebred pork producer association shall submit the names of pork producers to the commissioner, who shall appoint three (3) members from the nominations submitted by the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, three (3) members from the nominations submitted by the Tennessee Livestock Association or its successor organization and one (1) member from the nominations submitted by officially recognized purebred pork producer associations.

The original board shall be appointed with members appointed in the discretion of the commissioner, one (1) member for one (1) year, three (3) members for two (2) years and three (3) members for three (3) years. Each year thereafter, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of board members' terms, each organization or individual shall submit the names of nominees to the commissioner, and succeeding boards shall be appointed by the commissioner in the same manner, giving proportional representation to each organization as provided in this section.

Vacancies that occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made.

No board member shall serve more than a total of two (2) consecutive three-year terms unless that member does not serve as a board member for at least one (1) full year after serving two (2) consecutive three-year terms.

The commissioner shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the board.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. The pork promotion board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

43-29-120. Egg promotion board.

The Tennessee egg promotion board shall be composed of five (5) members, to be appointed by the commissioner to serve terms of three (3) years, as hereinafter provided. All five (5) members of the board shall be producers of eggs.

Within ten (10) days after the effective date of an assessment levied pursuant to this chapter, the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, the Tennessee Egg and Poultry Association and any egg producers and any agricultural organization with an interest in eggs may submit the names of egg producers to the commissioner, who shall appoint one (1) member from the nominations submitted by the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, three (3) members from the nominations submitted by the Tennessee Egg and Poultry Association and one (1) member from the other nominations submitted.

The original board shall be appointed with members appointed in the discretion of the commissioner, one (1) member for one (1) year, two (2) members for two (2) years and two (2) members for three (3) years. Each year thereafter, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of board members' terms, any individual organization as stated above may submit names of nominees to the commissioner, and succeeding board members shall be appointed by the commissioner.

Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made.

The commissioner shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the board.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 20.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b) was transferred to § 43-29-121 by the code commission in 2007.

Compiler's Notes. The egg promotion board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

43-29-121. First sales.

At the time of the first sale, the producer shall provide evidence that all assessments provided for under this chapter have been paid. If the first sale is made to an egg handler or egg dealer, the egg handler or egg dealer shall deduct the assessment owed from the amount paid to the producer.

Acts 1985, ch. 188, § 20; T.C.A. § 43-29-120(b).

Compiler's Notes. The provisions of this section were transferred to this location by the code commission in 2007.

43-29-122. Corn promotion board.

The Tennessee corn promotion board shall be composed of nine (9) members to be appointed by the commissioner to serve for terms of three (3) years, as provided in this section. All of the nine (9) members of the board shall be producers of corn in this state.

Within ten (10) days following the effective date of an assessment on corn levied pursuant to this chapter, the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation, the Tennessee Farmers Cooperative, and the Tennessee Corn Growers Association shall each submit the names of corn producers to the commissioner, and the commissioner shall appoint three (3) members from the nominees of each organization to serve on the board for rotating three-year terms.

The original board shall be appointed with members from each of the organizations appointed as follows: one (1) for one (1) year, one (1) for two (2) years, and one (1) for three (3) years. Each year thereafter, not less than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of board members' terms, each organization shall submit the names of three (3) nominees to the commissioner, and succeeding boards shall be appointed by the commissioner in the same manner, giving equal representation to each organization.

Vacancies that occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made. Persons who are appointed to the board shall serve no more than two (2) consecutive terms. The commissioner or a designee from the commissioner's staff shall serve as an advisor to the board.

The members of the board shall meet and organize within thirty (30) days of their appointment, and shall elect a chair, vice chair, and secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, each to serve for one-year terms, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by such officers or specifically designated by the board.

The board may establish rules for its own government and for the administration of the board's affairs.

The initial chair of the board elected pursuant to subsection (e) shall notify the government operations committee of the senate and the government operations committee of the house of representatives of the board's existence within thirty (30) days of the date of the initial chair's election.

Acts 2018, ch. 870, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 870, § 7. May 3, 2018.